de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Haarkosmetik > Haarstyling-Geräte > Kämme & Bürsten: Haarkämme; Haarbürsten & Kämme; Warmluftbürsten; Paddle-Haarbürsten; Rundbürsten; Glättbürsten
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Грижа за косата > Инструменти за оформяне на коса > Гребени и четки: Гребени за коса; Четки за коса и гребени; Четки с горещ въздух; Плоски четки за коса; Кръгли четки за коса; Четки за изправяне
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Péče o vlasy > Nástroje pro vlasový styling > Hřebeny a kartáče: Hřebeny; Kartáče a hřebeny na vlasy; Horkovzdušné kartáče; Pádlové kartáče na vlasy; Kulaté kartáče na vlasy; Rozčesávací hřebeny
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Chăm sóc tóc > Dụng cụ làm tóc > Lược và bàn chải: Lược cài tóc; Lược & lược chải tóc; Lược chải khí nóng; Lược chải tóc mái chèo; Lược chải tóc tròn; Lược chải tóc thẳng
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Njega kose > Alati za oblikovanje kose > Češljevi i četke: Češljevi za kosu; Četke i češljevi za kosu; Četke na vrući zrak; Ravne četke za kosu; Okrugle četke za kosu; Četke za ravnanje
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 頭髮保養 > 髮型工具 > 梳子和髮刷: 梳子; 髮刷和梳子; 熱風刷; 扁形髮梳; 圓形髮梳; 直髮梳
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cuidados com os cabelos > Utensílios de penteado > Pentes e escovas: Pentes para cabelo; Pentes e escovas de cabelo; Escovas de ar quente; Escovas de cabelo retas; Escovas de cabelo redondas; Escovas alisadora
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Hårvård > Frisörredskap > Kammar och borstar: Hårkammar; Hårborstar och kammar; Varmluftsborstar; Paddelhårborstar; Runda hårborstar; Plattborstar
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Hårpleje > Redskaber til hårstyling > Kamme og børster: Hårkamme; Hårbørster og kamme; Varmluftsbørster; Paddel-hårbørster; Runde hårbørster; Udglatningsbørster
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Nega las > Orodja za oblikovanje las > Glavniki in krtače: Glavniki za lase; Krtače in glavniki za lase; Krtače na vroč zrak; Ploščate krtače za lase; Okrogle krtače za lase; Krtače za ravnanje
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Уход за волосами > Инструменты для укладки волос > Расчески и щетки: Расчески для волос; Щетки для волос; Фены-щетки; Массажные щетки; Брашинги; Расчески для выпрямления
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Περιποίηση μαλλιών > Εργαλεία styling μαλλιών > Χτένες & βούρτσες: Χτένες μαλλιών; Βούρτσες μαλλιών & χτένες; Βούρτσες ζεστού αέρα; Βούρτσες μαλλιών με πλατιά επιφάνεια; Στρογγυλές βούρτσες μαλλιών; Βούρτσες ισιώματος
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > การดูแลผม > เครื่องมือจัดแต่งผม > หวีและแปรง: หวีสับ; แปรงและหวีผม; แปรงลมร้อน; แปรงผมทรงแพดเดิล; แปรงผมทรงกลม; แปรงยืดผม
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > ヘアケア用品 > ヘアスタイリング道具 > くし・ブラシ: コーム; ヘアブラシ・くし; ホットエアーブラシ; パドルヘアブラシ; ロールヘアブラシ; ストレートニングブラシ
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Hair Care > Hair Styling Tools > Combs & Brushes: Hair Combs; Hairbrushes & Combs; Hot Air Brushes; Paddle Hairbrushes; Round Hairbrushes; Straightening Brushes
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cuidado do cabelo > Equipamento para pentear o cabelo > Pentes e escovas: Pentes para o cabelo; Escovas de cabelo e pentes; Escovas de ar quente; Escovas de cabelo retangulares; Escovas de cabelo redondas; Escovas de alisamento
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Hårpleie > Hårstylingsverktøy > Kammer og børster: Hårkammer; Hårbørster og kammer; Varmluftsbørster; Padelhårbørster; Runde hårbørster; Rettebørster
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Îngrijirea părului > Instrumente de coafat > Piepteni și perii: Piepteni pentru păr; Perii și piepteni; Perii cu aer cald; Perii de păr dreptunghiulare; Perii de păr rotunde; Perii de îndreptat
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Pielęgnacja włosów > Narzędzia do stylizacji włosów > Grzebienie i szczotki: Grzebienie ozdobne; Szczotki do włosów i grzebienie; Szczotki na gorące powietrze; Wiosłowe szczotki do włosów; Okrągłe szczotki do włosów; Szczotki prostujące
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Starostlivosť o vlasy > Nástroje na úpravu vlasov > Hrebene a kefy: Hrebene na vlasy; Kefy a hrebene na vlasy; Teplovzdušné kefy; Ploché kefy na vlasy; Okrúhle kefy na vlasy; Vyrovnávacie kefy
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cuidado capilar > Útiles de peluquería > Peines y cepillos: Peines; Cepillos y peines; Cepillos de aire caliente; Cepillos de pala; Cepillos redondos; Cepillos alisadores
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Soin des cheveux > Outils de coiffure > Peignes et brosses: Peignes à cheveux; Brosses à cheveux et peignes; Brosses à air chaud; Brosses à cheveux plates; Brosses à cheveux rondes; Brosses lissantes
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 모발 관리 > 헤어 스타일링 도구 > 빗/브러시: 머리빗; 헤어브러시/빗; 핫에어 브러시; 넓은 헤어브러시; 둥근 헤어브러시; 일자형 헤어브러시
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Hajápolás > Hajformázó eszközök > Fésűk és kefék: Hajfésűk; Hajkefék és fésűk; Forrólevegős kefék; Lapos hajkefék; Kerek hajkefék; Egyenesítő kefék
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cura dei capelli > Utensili per parrucchieri > Pettini e spazzole: Pettinini per capelli; Spazzole e pettini; Spazzole ad aria calda; Spazzole per capelli; Spazzole per capelli rotonde; Spazzole liscianti
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Haarverzorging > Haarstylingsapparaten > Kammen en borstels: Haarkammen; Haarborstels en -kammen; Heteluchtborstels; Paddle-haarborstels; Ronde haarborstels; Stijlborstels
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Saç Bakımı > Saç Şekillendirme Aletleri > Taraklar ve Fırçalar: Tarak Tokalar; Saç Fırçaları ve Taraklar; Sıcak Hava Fırçaları; Kürekli Saç Fırçaları; Yuvarlak Saç Fırçaları; Doğrultma Fırçaları
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Plaukų priežiūra > Plaukų formavimo įrankiai > Šukos ir šepečiai: Plaukų šukos; Plaukų šepečiai ir šukos; Karšto oro šepečiai; Plokšti plaukų šepečiai; Apvalūs plaukų šepečiai; Tiesinimo šepečiai
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 头发护理 > 头发造型工具 > 发梳/发刷: 插梳/发插; 发刷/梳子; 热风刷; 桨式发刷; 圆形发刷; 直发刷
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Hiustenhoito > Hiusten muotoiluvälineet > Kammat ja harjat: Hiuskammat; Hiusharjat ja kammat; Kuumailmaharjat; Lapiomaiset hiusharjat; Pyöreät hiusharjat; Suoristusharjat